District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.06

Answer and expedited hearing.

(a)

An owner who has received a notice of violation shall answer within 5 days after service of the notice of violation. At the time that an owner answers the notice of violation, the owner may request a hearing on the allegations set forth in the notice of violation. If the owner fails to answer as required in the notice of violation, the owner shall be deemed to have admitted the violation and the Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue a default judgment ordering the owner to pay abatement costs, interest, and penalties as provided for in § 42-3141.07.

(b)

If an owner answers the notice of violation in the manner required in the notice of violation, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue a final order on that notice of violation no later than 30 days after the date on which the notice of violation was filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 7, 57 DCR 4353
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03, § 42-3141.07, and § 42-3141.11.